District of Columbia statutes.
50-104

Penalty.

Any person who violates this chapter shall be subject to a civil fine of not less than $100 nor more than $500 for the 1st offense or not less than $500 nor more than $1000 for the 2nd or subsequent offense, a suspension of the restaurant or other business license for up to 60 days, or both.

Sept. 20, 1990, D.C. Law 8-162, § 5, 37 DCR 4671
1981 Ed., § 40-1904.